Utah statutes.
13-32a-110.5.   Transactions with certain persons prohibited.

A pawn or secondhand business may not purchase, accept as a pawn, or take for consignment any property from a person who:

(1)  is younger than 18 years of age; or

(2)  appears to be acting under the influence of alcohol or any controlled substance.

